ladina.dic
abstineō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:abstinēre
amāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:amāre
ambulāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:ambulāre
ambulāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:ambulāre
amō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:amāre
amātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:amāre
cantāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:cantāre
cantāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:cantāre
cantō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:cantāre
cōgitātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:cōgitāre
cōgitāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:cōgitāre
comparō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:comparāre
comparāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:comparāre
crēscere/1,11,1033,10330 po:verb st:crēscere
crētum/1,11,1023,10231 po:verb st:crēscere
crēscō/1,11,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:crēscere
crēvī/1,11,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:crēscere
datum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:dare
debeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:debēre
dedī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:dare
doceō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:docēre
doleō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:dolēre
est/10 po:verb is:3sg is:praes. ind. act. st:sum
festīnō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:festīnāre
festīnāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:festīnāre
habeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:habēre
imperāvi/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:imperāre
imperātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:imperāre
iubeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:iubēre
iuvāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:iuvāre
iuvō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:iuvāre
laborātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:laborāre
laborāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:laborāre
laudāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:laudāre
laudō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:laudāre
liberātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:liberāre
liberāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:liberāre
maneō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:manēre
mutāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:mutāre
mutō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:mutāre
narrātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:narrāre
narrāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:narrāre
nōmināre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:nōmināre
nōminō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:nōmināre
obumbrātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:obumbrāre
obumbrāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:obumbrāre
obdūrō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:obdūrāre
obdūrāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:obdūrāre
orātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:orāre
orāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:orāre
ornāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:ornāre
orō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:orāre
putātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:putāre
respondeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 st:respondēre
salveō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:salvēre
spectātum/1,1021,10211 po:verb st:spectāre
spectāvī/1,1011,10111,10112,10113,10114 po:verb st:spectāre
studeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:studēre
sumus/10 po:verb is:1pl is:praes. ind. act. st:sum
timeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:timēre
vetāre/1,1031,10310 po:verb st:vetāre
vetō/1,1001,10011,10012,10013,10014,10015,10016,10017 po:verb st:vetāre
eram/10 po:verb is:1sg is:imperf. ind. pass. st:sum
erat/10 po:verb is:3sg is:imperf. ind. pass. st:sum
erātis/10 po:verb is:2pl is:imperf. ind. pass. st:sum
erō/10 po:verb is:1sg is:fut. I ind. act. st:sum
erit/10 po:verb is:3sg is:fut. I ind. act. st:sum
eritis/10 po:verb is:2pl is:fut. I ind. act. st:sum
sim/10 po:verb is:1sg is:praes. con. act. st:sum
sit/10 po:verb is:3sg is:praes. con. act. st:sum
sītis/10 po:verb is:2pl is:praes. con. act. st:sum
esse/10,1,10330 po:verb st:sum
